tortoisesvn/ext/spell/pt_PT.aff
SFX K Y 238
SFX K   ir             o              uir
SFX K   r              o              air
SFX K   r              s              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             i              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ímos           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ís             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             em             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ía             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ías            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íamos          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íeis           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íam            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             í              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íste           [ua]ir
SFX K   r              u              [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ímos           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ístes          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íram           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íra            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íras           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íramos         [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íreis          [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ei             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ás             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              á              [ua]ir
SFX K   0              emos           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              eis            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ão             [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             a              uir
SFX K   ir             as             uir
SFX K   ir             amos           uir
SFX K   ir             ais            uir
SFX K   ir             am             uir
SFX K   r              a              air
SFX K   r              as             air
SFX K   r              amos           air
SFX K   r              ais            air
SFX K   r              am             air
SFX K   ir             ísse           [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ísses          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íssemos        [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ísseis         [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íssem          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             íres           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              mos            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             írdes          [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             írem           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ia             [ua]ir
SFX K   0              ias            [ua]ir
SFX K   0              íamos          [ua]ir
SFX K   0              íeis           [ua]ir
SFX K   0              iam            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             í              [ua]ir
SFX K   r              ndo            [ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ído            [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ída            [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ídos           [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ídas           [^q][ua]ir
SFX K   ir             ido            quir
SFX K   ir             ida            quir
SFX K   ir             idos           quir
SFX K   ir             idas           quir
SFX K   r              nho            por
SFX K   or             ões            por
SFX K   or             õe             por
SFX K   r              mos            por
SFX K   r              ndes           por
SFX K   or             õem            por
SFX K   or             unha           por
SFX K   or             unhas          por
SFX K   or             únhamos        por
SFX K   or             únheis         por
SFX K   or             unham          por
SFX K   or             us             por
SFX K   or             useste         por
SFX K   or             ôs             por
SFX K   or             usemos         por
SFX K   or             usestes        por
SFX K   or             useram         por
SFX K   or             usera          por
SFX K   or             useras         por
SFX K   or             uséramos       por
SFX K   or             uséreis        por
SFX K   0              ei             por
SFX K   0              ás             por
SFX K   0              á              por
SFX K   0              emos           por
SFX K   0              eis            por
SFX K   0              ão             por
SFX K   r              nha            por
SFX K   r              nhas           por
SFX K   r              nhamos         por
SFX K   r              nhais          por
SFX K   r              nham           por
SFX K   or             usesse         por
SFX K   or             usesses        por
SFX K   or             uséssemos      por
SFX K   or             usésseis       por
SFX K   or             usessem        por
SFX K   or             user           por
SFX K   or             useres         por
SFX K   or             user           por
SFX K   or             usermos        por
SFX K   or             userdes        por
SFX K   or             userem         por
SFX K   0              ia             por
SFX K   0              ias            por
SFX K   0              íamos          por
SFX K   0              íeis           por
SFX K   0              iam            por
SFX K   r              nde            por
SFX K   r              ndo            por
SFX K   r              sto            por
SFX K   r              sta            por
SFX K   r              stos           por
SFX K   r              stas           por
SFX K   0              es             por
SFX K   0              mos            por
SFX K   0              des            por
SFX K   0              em             por
SFX K   zer            ço             fazer
SFX K   r              s              fazer
SFX K   zer            z              fazer
SFX K   r              mos            fazer
SFX K   r              is             fazer
SFX K   r              m              fazer
SFX K   er             ia             fazer
SFX K   er             ias            fazer
SFX K   er             íamos          fazer
SFX K   er             íeis           fazer
SFX K   er             iam            fazer
SFX K   azer           iz             fazer
SFX K   azer           izeste         fazer
SFX K   azer           ez             fazer
SFX K   azer           izemos         fazer
SFX K   azer           izestes        fazer
SFX K   azer           izeram         fazer
SFX K   azer           izera          fazer
SFX K   azer           izeras         fazer
SFX K   azer           izéramos       fazer
SFX K   azer           izéreis        fazer
SFX K   zer            rei            fazer
SFX K   zer            rás            fazer
SFX K   zer            rá             fazer
SFX K   zer            remos          fazer
SFX K   zer            reis           fazer
SFX K   zer            rão            fazer
SFX K   zer            ça             fazer
SFX K   zer            ças            fazer
SFX K   zer            çamos          fazer
SFX K   zer            çais           fazer
SFX K   zer            çam            fazer
SFX K   azer           izesse         fazer
SFX K   azer           izesses        fazer
SFX K   azer           izéssemos      fazer
SFX K   azer           izésseis       fazer
SFX K   azer           izessem        fazer
SFX K   azer           izer           fazer
SFX K   azer           izeres         fazer
SFX K   azer           izer           fazer
SFX K   azer           izermos        fazer
SFX K   azer           izerdes        fazer
SFX K   azer           izerem         fazer
SFX K   zer            ria            fazer
SFX K   zer            rias           fazer
SFX K   zer            ríamos         fazer
SFX K   zer            ríeis          fazer
SFX K   zer            riam           fazer
SFX K   r              i              fazer
SFX K   r              ndo            fazer
SFX K   azer           eito           fazer
SFX K   azer           eita           fazer
SFX K   azer           eitos          fazer
SFX K   azer           eitas          fazer
SFX K   0              es             fazer
SFX K   0              mos            fazer
SFX K   0              des            fazer
SFX K   0              em             fazer
SFX K   zer            go             dizer
SFX K   r              s              dizer
SFX K   zer            z              dizer
SFX K   r              mos            dizer
SFX K   r              is             dizer
