tortoisesvn/ext/spell/pt_PT.dic
abstrair/K
afazer/K
afluir/K
aluir/KM
antedizer/K
antepor/K
anuir/K
apor/K
atrair/KM
atribuir/pKcDv
bendizer/K
cair/KM
carnifazer/K
compor/KR
concluir/K
condizer/Kn
confluir/K
constituir/KcDvR
contradizer/K
contrafazer/K
contrapor/K
contrapropor/K
contribuir/KcDn
decair/KM
decompor/K
defluir/K
depor/K
descair/KM
descompor/K
desdizer/K
desfruir/K
destituir/Kc
diluir/KcM
diminuir/KcD
dispor/K
distrair/KMD
distribuir/KcDv
dizer/pKv
efluir/K
esvair/KM
evoluir/K
excluir/K
expor/KRc
extorquir/K
extrair/Kv
fazer/KDSRv
fluir/K
fruir/Kc
imbuir/Kc
imiscuir/Kc
impor/K
incluir/K
indispor/K
influir/KD
instituir/KcDR
interdizer/K
interpor/K
intuir/Kc
justapor/K
liquefazer/K
maldizer/Kn
malfazer/Kn
opor/K
perfazer/K
poluir/KcvDS
pospor/K
possuir/KDn
predispor/K
predizer/K
prepor/K
pressupor/K
promiscuir/K
propor/K
prostituir/KcDv
protrair/K
putrefazer/K
rarefazer/K
recair/KM
redistribuir/Kc
refluir/K
repor/K
ressair/K
ressequir/K
restituir/KcDv
retorquir/Kv
retrair/KM
retribuir/KcD
ruir/K
sair/Kn
satisfazer/Kv
sobrepor/K
sobressair/K
subpor/K
substituir/Kcnv
subtrair/K
supor/K
transpor/K
trespor/K
usufruir/KcD
